California statutes. Water Code
 or disbursement requests from the state board, the state board shall take into account the nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the violation, any prior history of misrepresentations by the person to the state board or a local agency, any economic benefits or savings that resulted or would have resulted from the false statement, and any other matters as justice may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 187, Sec. 6.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13494.

Upon motion and sufficient showing by any party, the court or board, as appropriate, shall join to the action a person who may be liable for costs or expenditures of the type recoverable under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 187, Sec. 6.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13495.

The standard of liability for any costs recoverable pursuant to this chapter is strict liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 187, Sec. 6.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13496.

(a) A recipient’s indemnification, hold harmless, conveyance, or similar contract with a third party shall not preclude any liability for costs recoverable under this chapter. This section does not bar any contract to insure, hold harmless, or indemnify a party to the contract.

(b) The entry of judgment against any party to the action does not bar any future action by the state board against any person who is later discovered to be potentially liable for costs incurred by the state board related to any financial assistance program.

(c) Payment of a claim or disbursement request by the state board under
 this chapter is subject to the state acquiring by subrogation the rights of the recipient to recover financial assistance moneys from a third party under the financial assistance agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 187, Sec. 6.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13497.

(a) Any person, including a recipient, recipient’s contractor, consultant, employee, agent, assignee, or grantee who violates any requirement or term of a financial assistance agreement is liable for a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day of violation, not to exceed 25 percent of the total amount of the financial assistance agreement.

(b) The Attorney General, upon request of the state board, shall bring an action in superior court to impose the civil penalty specified in subdivision (a).

(c) The state board may impose the civil penalty administratively pursuant to
 Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13323) of Chapter 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 187, Sec. 6.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13498.

(a) A recipient or a recipient’s consultant or contractor or other agent furnishing any information related to funds disbursed or costs claimed for reimbursement pursuant to a financial assistance agreement under this chapter as the state board may require shall personally attest that the information is true, accurate, and complete to the best of one’s knowledge, under penalty of law.

(b) A person who fails or refuses to furnish information under subdivision (a) or furnishes false information to the state board is subject, in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (c), to civil liability of not more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) for each
 violation of this subdivision.

(c) (1) A recipient shall not be liable under subdivision (b) unless the court or the state board, as the case may be, finds any of the following:

(A) The alleged violation is knowing, willful, or intentional.

(B) The recipient or a recipient’s consultant or contractor or other agent received a material economic benefit from the action that caused the alleged violation.

(C) The alleged violation is chronic or that the recipient or a recipient’s consultant or contractor or other agent is a recalcitrant violator, as determined pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 13399.

(d) The Attorney General, upon request of the state board, shall bring an action in superior court to impose the civil liability specified in subdivision (b).

(e) The state board may impose the civil liability specified in subdivision (b) administratively under Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13323) of Chapter 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 187, Sec. 6.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13499.

(a) A person who makes a misrepresentation in any submittal to the state board, including, but not limited to, an application, report, certification, record, invoice, form, or other document that is submitted to the state board relating to a financial assistance agreement, is subject to civil liability of not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for each violation of this subdivision.

(b) The Attorney General, upon request of the state board, shall bring an action in superior court to impose the civil liability specified in subdivision (a).

(c) The state board may impose the civil liability administratively
 under Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 13323) of Chapter 5.

(d) The state board shall file a complaint with any applicable licensing board against any person licensed or otherwise regulated by that licensing board who is found to be liable under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 187, Sec. 6.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13499.2.

(a) A person who knowingly makes or causes to be made any false statement, material misrepresentation, or false certification in any submittal to the state board relating to an agreement, including, but not limited to, applications, records, reports, certifications, plans, invoices, forms, or other documents that are submitted, filed, or required to be received by the state board for purposes of obtaining or administering a financial assistance agreement, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a criminal fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or in the state prison for 16 months, two years, or three years, or by both that fine and
 imprisonment.

(b) The Attorney General, or a district attorney, upon request of the state board, may bring an action in superior court to impose the criminal penalty specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the state board from refusing to enter into an agreement with a recipient if the recipient has been convicted for a fraud crime or found civilly liable for fraud or misrepresentation in a civil or administrative proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 187, Sec. 6.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13499.4.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), remedies under this chapter are in addition to, and do not supersede or limit, any other remedy, civil or criminal, including, but not limited to, the state board’s rights and remedies under an agreement.

(b) Civil liability shall not be imposed both administratively and by the superior court for the same violation.

(c) In determining the appropriate amount of liability under Section 13497, 13498, or 13499, the court, or the state board, as the case may be, shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the extent of harm caused
 by the violation, the nature and persistence of the violation,
 the length of time over which the violation occurs, and the corrective action, if any, taken by the violator.

(d) (1) Unless the state board determines that deposit in another fund would be more effective for providing financial assistance for the same or substantially similar purpose, all moneys collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited into the fund from which the financial assistance agreement that is the subject of the action originated.

(2) If the moneys deposited pursuant to paragraph (1) are derived from the imposition of penalties and are deposited into a fund that is continuously appropriated, that continuous appropriation shall not apply to the moneys. The moneys shall be separately accounted for and shall be available,
 upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes for which expenditures from that fund are authorized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 187, Sec. 6.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Water Reclamation [13500. - 13558.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [13500. - 13500.]

13500.

This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the Water Recycling Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Declaration of Policy [13510. - 13512.]

13510.

It is hereby declared that the people of the state have a primary interest in the development of facilities to recycle water containing waste to supplement existing surface and underground water supplies and to assist in meeting the future water requirements of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13511.

The Legislature finds and declares that a substantial portion of the future water requirements of this state may be economically met by beneficial use of recycled water.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the utilization of recycled water by local communities for domestic, agricultural, industrial, recreational, and fish and wildlife purposes will contribute to the peace, health, safety and welfare of the people of the state. Use of recycled water constitutes the development of “new basic water supplies” as that term is used in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 12880) of Part 6 of Division 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13512.

It is the intention of the Legislature that the state undertake all possible steps to encourage development of water recycling facilities so that recycled water may be made available to help meet the growing water requirements of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. State Assistance [13515. - 13515.]

13515.

In order to implement the policy declarations of this chapter, the state board is authorized to provide loans for the development of water reclamation facilities, or for studies and investigations in connection with water reclamation, pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 13400) of this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Regulation of Reclamation [13520. - 13529.4.]

13520.

As used in this article “recycling criteria” are the levels of constituents of recycled water, and means for assurance of reliability under the design concept which will result in recycled water safe from the standpoint of public health, for the uses to be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13521.

The State Department of Public Health shall establish uniform statewide recycling criteria for each varying type of use of recycled water where the use involves the protection of public health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 700, Sec. 2.   (SB 918)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13521.1.

(a) By December 31, 2016, the state board, in consultation with impacted state agencies, shall determine whether the use of disinfected tertiary treated recycled water, as defined by Section 60301.230 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, for the purpose of providing water to animals, would not pose a significant risk to public and animal health. If the state board determines that the use of disinfected tertiary treated recycled water for the purpose
 of providing water to animals would pose a significant risk to public or animal health, the state board shall establish uniform statewide recycling criteria for the use of disinfected tertiary treated recycled water for the purpose of providing water to animals. Except as provided in subdivision (c), if the state board determines that the use of disinfected tertiary treated recycled water for the purpose of providing water to
 animals would not pose a significant risk to public or animal health, the state board may approve the use of disinfected tertiary treated recycled water for these purposes.

(b) In evaluating the use of disinfected tertiary treated recycled water for the purpose of providing water to animals, the state board shall
 consider, at minimum, all of the following:

(1) Recommendations from the existing Advisory Panel on Constituents of Emerging Concerns in Recycled Water.

(2) State-funded research performed pursuant to Section 79144 and subdivision (b) of Section 79145.

(3) Research by the state board relating to unregulated pollutants.

(c) Disinfected tertiary treated recycled water shall not be used in the water supply for dairy animals that are currently producing dairy products for human consumption.

(d) A person shall not be required to use disinfected tertiary
 treated recycled water for the purposes described in this section.

(e) The adoption of uniform statewide recycling criteria pursuant to this section shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “animal” includes any domesticated bird, bovine animal, horse, mule, burro, sheep, goat, or swine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 731, Sec. 1.   (AB 2071)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13521.2.

(a) On or before January 1, 2023, the state board shall update the uniform statewide criteria for nonpotable recycled water uses established in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 60301.050) of Division 4 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. The deadline imposed by this section is mandatory only if the Legislature has appropriated sufficient funds, as determined by the executive director of the state board, in the annual Budget Act or otherwise to cover the state board’s costs associated with the performance of the duties imposed by this section.

(b) For purposes of the update to the uniform statewide criteria for nonpotable recycled water uses described in subdivision (a), the state board shall adopt a regulation that incorporates by reference the criteria and applicable backflow protection provisions, including the provisions for the use of a swivel or changeover device for dual-plumbed systems, that are contained in the most recently adopted version of the policy handbook adopted pursuant to Section 116407 of the Health and Safety Code and any future versions of the policy handbook.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 455, Sec. 3.   (AB 1180)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13522.

(a) If the State Department of Public Health or a local health officer finds that a contamination exists as a result of the use of recycled water, the department or local health officer shall order the contamination abated in accordance with the procedure provided for in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 5400) of Part 3 of Division 5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The use of recycled water in accordance with the uniform statewide recycling criteria established pursuant to Section 13521, for the purpose of this section, does not cause, constitute, or contribute to, any form of contamination, unless the department or the regional board determines that contamination
 exists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 40.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13522.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e), any person recycling or proposing to recycle water, or using or proposing to use recycled water, within any region for any purpose for which recycling criteria have been established, shall file with the appropriate regional board a report containing information required by the regional board.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (e), every person recycling water or using recycled water shall file with the appropriate regional board a report of any material change or proposed change in the character of the recycled water or its use.

(c) Each report under this section shall be sworn to, or submitted under penalty of perjury.

(d) This section shall not be construed so as to require any report in the case of any producing, manufacturing, or processing operation involving the recycling of water solely for use in the producing, manufacturing, or processing operation.

(e) Except upon the written request of the regional board, a report is not required pursuant to this section from any user of recycled water which is being supplied by a supplier or distributor for whom a master recycling permit has been issued pursuant to Section 13523.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13522.6.

Any person failing to furnish a report under Section 13522.5 when so requested by a regional board is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

13522.7.

The Attorney General, at the request of the regional board, shall petition the superior court for the issuance of a temporary restraining order, temporary injunction or permanent injunction, or combination thereof, as may be appropriate, requiring any person not complying with Section 13522.5 to comply forthwith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

13523.

(a) Each regional board, after consulting with and receiving the recommendations of the State Department of Public Health and any party who has requested in writing to be consulted, and after any necessary hearing, shall, if in the judgment of the board, it is necessary to protect the public health, safety, or welfare, prescribe water recycling requirements for water that is used or proposed to be used as recycled water.

(b) The requirements may be placed upon the person recycling water, the user, or both. The requirements shall be established in conformance with the uniform statewide recycling criteria established pursuant to Section 13521. The regional board may require the submission of a preconstruction report for the purpose of determining compliance with the
 uniform statewide recycling criteria. The requirements for a use of recycled water not addressed by the uniform statewide recycling criteria shall be considered on a case-by-case basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 41.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13523.1.

(a) Each regional board, after consulting with, and receiving the recommendations of, the State Department of Public Health and any party who has requested in writing to be consulted, with the consent of the proposed permittee, and after any necessary hearing, may, in lieu of issuing waste discharge requirements pursuant to Section 13263 or water recycling requirements pursuant to Section 13523 for a user of recycled water, issue a master recycling permit to a supplier or distributor, or both, of recycled water.

(b) A master recycling permit shall include, at least, all of the following:

(1) Waste discharge
 requirements, adopted pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 13260) of Chapter 4.

(2) A requirement that the permittee comply with the uniform statewide recycling criteria established pursuant to Section 13521. Permit conditions for a use of recycled water not addressed by the uniform statewide water recycling criteria shall be considered on a case-by-case basis.

(3) A requirement that the permittee establish and enforce rules or regulations for recycled water users, governing the design and construction of recycled water use facilities and the use of recycled water, in accordance with the uniform statewide recycling criteria established pursuant to Section 13521.

(4) A requirement that the permittee submit a quarterly report summarizing recycled water use, including the total amount of recycled water
 supplied, the total number of recycled water use sites, and the locations of those sites, including the names of the hydrologic areas underlying the recycled water use sites.

(5) A requirement that the permittee conduct periodic inspections of the facilities of the recycled water users to monitor compliance by the users with the uniform statewide recycling criteria established pursuant to Section 13521 and the requirements of the master recycling permit.

(6) Any other requirements determined to be appropriate by the regional board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 42.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13523.5.

A regional board may not deny issuance of water reclamation requirements to a project which violates only a salinity standard in the basin plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1541, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

13524.

No person shall recycle water or use recycled water for any purpose for which recycling criteria have been established until water recycling requirements have been established pursuant to this article or a regional board determines that no requirements are necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13525.

Upon the refusal or failure of any person or persons recycling water or using recycled water to comply with the provisions of this article, the Attorney General, at the request of the regional board, shall petition the superior court for the issuance of a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction, or combination thereof, as may be appropriate, prohibiting forthwith any person or persons from violating or threatening to violate the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13525.5.

Any person recycling water or using recycled water in violation of Section 13524, after such violation has been called to his attention in writing by the regional board, is guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day of such recycling or use shall constitute a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13526.

Any person who, after such action has been called to his attention in writing by the regional board, uses recycled water for any purpose for which recycling criteria have been established prior to the establishment of water recycling requirements, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13527.

(a) In administering any statewide program of financial assistance for water pollution or water quality control which may be delegated to it pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 13400) of this division, the state board shall give added consideration to water quality control facilities providing optimum water recycling and use of recycled water.

(b) Nothing in this chapter prevents the appropriate regional board from establishing waste discharge requirements if a discharge is involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13528.

This chapter shall not be construed as affecting the powers of the State Department of Public Health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 43.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13528.5.

(a) The state board may carry out the duties and authority granted to a regional board pursuant to this chapter.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 35, Sec. 191.   (SB 861)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13529.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The purpose of Section 13529.2 is to establish notification requirements for unauthorized discharges of recycled water to waters of the state.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to promote the efficient and safe use of recycled water.

(c) The people of the state have a primary interest in the development of facilities to recycle water to supplement existing water supplies and to minimize the impacts of growing demand for new water on sensitive natural water bodies.

(d) A substantial portion of the future water requirements of the state may be economically met by the beneficial use of recycled water.

(e) The Legislature has established a statewide goal to recycle 700,000 acre-feet of water per year by the year 2000 and 1,000,000 acre-feet of water per year by the year 2010.

(f) The use of recycled water has proven to be safe and the State Department of Health Services is drafting regulations to provide for expanded uses of recycled water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 833, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

13529.2.

(a) Any person who, without regard to intent or negligence, causes or permits an unauthorized discharge of 50,000 gallons or more of recycled water, as defined in subdivision (c), or 1,000 gallons or more of recycled water, as defined in subdivision (d), in or on any waters of the state, or causes or permits such unauthorized discharge to be discharged where it is, or probably will be, discharged in or on any waters of the state, shall, as soon as (1) that person has knowledge of the discharge, (2) notification is possible, and (3) notification can be provided without substantially impeding cleanup or other emergency measures, immediately notify the appropriate regional board.

(b) For the purposes of this section, an unauthorized discharge means a discharge not
 authorized by waste discharge requirements pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 13260) of Chapter 4, water reclamation requirements pursuant to Section 13523, a master reclamation permit pursuant to Section 13523.1, or any other provision of this division.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “recycled water” means wastewater treated as “disinfected tertiary 2.2 recycled water,” as defined or described by the State Department of Health Care Services or wastewater receiving advanced treatment beyond disinfected tertiary 2.2 recycled water once it completes the required treatment process and enters a storage tank, pipeline, or canal for conveyance or distribution.

(d) For purposes of this section, “recycled water” means “recycled water,” as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 13050, which is treated at a level less than “disinfected tertiary 2.2 recycled water,” as
 defined or described by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(e) For the purposes of this section, water discharged from a decorative body of water during storm events shall not be considered an unauthorized discharge if recycled water was used to restore levels due to evaporation. For purposes of this subdivision, “decorative body of water” means an impoundment for aesthetic enjoyment or landscape irrigation, or which otherwise serves a similar use or function, in which recycled water is stored or used and is not intended to include public contact.

(f) The requirements in this section supplement, and shall not supplant, any other provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   (SB 31)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13529.4.

(a) Any person refusing or failing to provide the notice required by Section 13529.2, or as required by a condition of waste discharge requirements requiring notification of unauthorized releases of recycled water as defined in Section 13529.2, may be subject to administrative civil liability in an amount not to exceed the following:

(1) For the first violation, or a subsequent violation occurring more than 365 days from a previous violation, five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) For a second violation occurring within 365 days of a previous violation, ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(3) For a third or subsequent violation occurring within 365 days of a previous violation, twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(b) The penalties in this section supplement, and shall not supplant, any other provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 833, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Surveys and Investigations [13530. - 13530.]

13530.

The department, either independently or in cooperation with any person or any county, state, federal, or other agency, or on request of the state board, to the extent funds are allocated therefor, shall conduct surveys and investigations relating to the reclamation of water from waste pursuant to Section 230.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Waste Well Regulation [13540. - 13541.]

13540.

(a) A person shall not construct, maintain, or use any waste well extending to or into a subterranean water-bearing stratum that is used or intended to be used as, or is suitable for, a source of water supply for domestic purposes.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when a regional board finds that water quality considerations do not preclude controlled recharge of the stratum by direct injection, and when the State Department of Public Health, following a public hearing, finds the proposed recharge will not degrade the quality of water in the receiving aquifer as a source of water supply for domestic purposes, recycled water may be injected by a well into
 the stratum. The State Department of Public Health may make and enforce any regulations pertaining to this subdivision as it deems proper.

(2) This section shall not be construed to do either or both of the following:

(A) Affect the authority of the state board or regional boards to prescribe and enforce requirements for the discharge.

(B) Preempt the exercise by a water district of its existing ordinance authority to impose or implement stricter standards for protecting groundwater quality in the receiving aquifer.

(c) If the State Department of Public Health makes the findings provided for in subdivision (b), the department shall consider the state board’s Statement of Policy with Respect to Maintaining High Quality of Waters in California, as set
 forth in Resolution 68-16, dated October 28, 1968, and shall also consider current and potential future public health consequences of the controlled recharge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 288, Sec. 44.   (SB 1169)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13541.

As used in this article, “waste well” includes any hole dug or drilled into the ground, used or intended to be used for the disposal of waste.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Water Reuse [13550. - 13557.]

13550.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the use of potable domestic water for nonpotable uses, including, but not limited to, cemeteries, golf courses, parks, highway landscaped areas, and industrial and irrigation uses, is a waste or an unreasonable use of the water within the meaning of Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution if recycled water is available which meets all of the following conditions, as determined by the state board, after notice to any person or entity who may be ordered to use recycled water or to cease using potable water and a hearing held pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 648) of Chapter 1.5 of Division 3 of Title 23 of the California Code of
 Regulations:

(1) The source of recycled water is of adequate quality for these uses and is available for these uses. In determining adequate quality, the state board shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, food and employee safety, and level and types of specific constituents in the recycled water affecting these uses, on a user-by-user basis. In addition, the state board shall consider the effect of the use of recycled water in lieu of potable water on the generation of hazardous waste and on the quality of wastewater discharges subject to regional, state, or federal permits.

(2) The recycled water may be furnished for these uses at a reasonable cost to the user. In determining reasonable cost, the state board shall consider all relevant factors,
 including, but not limited to, the present and projected costs of supplying, delivering, and treating potable domestic water for these uses and the present and projected costs of supplying and delivering recycled water for these uses, and shall find that the cost of supplying the treated recycled water is comparable to, or less than, the cost of supplying potable domestic water.

(3) After concurrence with the State Department of Public Health, the use of recycled water from the proposed source will not be detrimental to public health.

(4) The use of recycled water for these uses will not adversely affect downstream water rights, will not degrade water quality, and is determined not to be injurious to plantlife, fish, and wildlife.

(b) In making the determination pursuant to subdivision (a), the state board shall consider the impact of the cost and quality of the nonpotable water on each individual user.

(c) The state board may require a public agency or person subject to this article to furnish information which the state board determines to be relevant to making the determination required in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 544, Sec. 14.   (SB 1458)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

13551.

(a) A person or public agency, including a state agency, city, county, city and county, district, or any other political subdivision of the state, shall not use water from any source of quality suitable for potable domestic use for nonpotable uses, including cemeteries, golf courses, parks, highway landscaped areas, and industrial and irrigation uses if suitable recycled water is available as provided in Section 13550.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any use of recycled water in lieu of water suitable for potable domestic use shall, to the extent of the recycled water so used, be deemed to constitute a reasonable beneficial use of that water and the use of recycled water shall not cause any loss or diminution of any existing water right.

(c) Incidental amounts of spray, mist, or runoff shall be permitted to enter outdoor eating areas of parks and open spaces when irrigated with disinfected tertiary treated recycled water that complies with Section 493.4 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 736, Sec. 3.   (SB 31)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13552.

The amendments to Sections 13550 and 13551 of the Water Code made during the first year of the 1991–92 Regular Session are not intended to alter any rights, remedies, or obligations which may exist prior to January 1, 1992, pursuant to, but not limited to, those sections or Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 1501) of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 553, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13552.2.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the use of potable domestic water for the irrigation of residential landscaping is a waste or an unreasonable use of water within the meaning of Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution if recycled water, for this use, is available to the residents and meets the requirements set forth in Section 13550, as determined by the state board after notice and a hearing.

(b) The state board may require a public agency or person subject to this section to submit information that the state board determines may be relevant in making the determination required in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13552.4.

(a) Any public agency, including a state agency, city, county, city and county, district, or any other political subdivision of the state, may require the use of recycled water for irrigation of residential landscaping, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) Recycled water, for this use, is available to the user and meets the requirements set forth in Section 13550, as determined by the state board after notice and a hearing.

(2) The use of recycled water does not cause any loss or diminution of any existing water right.

(3) The irrigation systems are constructed in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section
 60301.050) of Division 4 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) This section applies to both of the following:

(1) New subdivisions for which the building permit is issued on or after March 15, 1994, or, if a building permit is not required, new structures for which construction begins on or after March 15, 1994, for which the state board has approved the use of recycled water.

(2) Any residence that is retrofitted to permit the use of recycled water for landscape irrigation and for which the
 state board has approved the use of recycled water.

(c) (1) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code does not apply to any project that only involves the repiping, redesign, or use of recycled water for irrigation of residential landscaping necessary to comply with a requirement prescribed by a public agency under subdivision (a).

(2) The exemption in paragraph (1) does not apply to any project to develop recycled water, to construct conveyance facilities for recycled water, or any other project not specified in this subdivision.

(d) Outdoor landscape irrigation of common areas that does not enter the boundaries of a
 residence is not to be considered a part of the same premises as an individual residence and shall not be considered a dual plumbed system. Recycled water used for this purpose shall comply with Section 13550.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 736, Sec. 4.   (SB 31)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13552.5.

(a) (1) On or before July 31, 2009, the state board shall adopt a general permit for landscape irrigation uses of recycled water for which the State Department of Public Health has established uniform statewide recycling criteria pursuant to Section 13521.

(2) The state board shall establish criteria to determine eligibility for coverage under the general permit.
